Nebraska, session 109, LB1139.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1139 LB1139
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 42-371, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
42-371 Under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act and sections
42-347 to 42-381, 43-290, 43-512 to 43-512.10, and 43-1401 to 43-1418:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this section, all
(1) All judgments and orders for payment of money shall be liens, as in
other actions, upon real property and any personal property registered
with any county office and may be enforced or collected by execution and
the means authorized for collection of money judgments. ;
(b) A judgment or order for payment of child support or spousal
support creates a lien upon the real or personal property of the judgment
debtor which attaches when the payment is due and extinguishes when the
payment is made.
(c) For purposes of this section, a current child support or spousal
support order payment history from the Title IV-D Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services setting forth evidence that all
support payments are current, and have been made as ordered for the
previous twelve-month period or the total length of time the order has
been in effect, whichever is shorter, is prima facie evidence that such
payments are in fact current and such evidence operates to release the
lien described in subdivision (1)(b) of this section for purposes of
transferring a specific parcel of real property;
(2) The judgment creditor may execute a partial or total release of
the judgment or a document subordinating the lien of the judgment to any
other lien, generally or on specific real or personal property.
Release of a judgment for child support or spousal support or
subordination of a lien of a judgment for child support or spousal
support may, if all such payments are current and not delinquent or in
arrears, be released or subordinated by a release or subordination
document executed by the judgment creditor, and such document shall be
sufficient to remove or subordinate the lien. A properly executed,
-2-

LB1139 LB1139
2026 2026
notarized release or subordination document explicitly reciting that all
child support payments or spousal support payments are current is prima
facie evidence that such payments are in fact current. For purposes of
this section, any delinquency or arrearage of support payments shall be
determined as provided in subsection (2) of section 42-358.02;
(3) If a judgment creditor refuses to execute a release of the
judgment or subordination of a lien as provided in subdivision (2) of
this section or the support payments are not current, the person desiring
such release or subordination may file an application for the relief
desired in the court which rendered the original judgment. A copy of the
application and a notice of hearing shall be served on the judgment
creditor either personally or by registered or certified mail no later
than ten days before the date of hearing. If the court finds that the
release or subordination is not requested for the purpose of avoiding
payment and that the release or subordination will not unduly reduce the
security, the court may issue an order releasing real or personal
property from the judgment lien or issue an order subordinating the
judgment lien. As a condition for such release or subordination, the
court may require the posting of a bond with the clerk in an amount fixed
by the court, guaranteeing payment of the judgment. If the court orders a
release or subordination, the court may order a judgment creditor who,
without a good faith reason, refused to execute a release or
subordination to pay the judgment debtor's court costs and attorney's
fees involved with the application brought under this subdivision. A
showing that all support payments are current shall be evidence that the
judgment creditor did not have a good faith reason to refuse to execute
such release or subordination. For purposes of this section, a current
certified copy of support order payment history from the Title IV-D
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services setting forth
evidence that all support payments are current is prima facie evidence
that such payments are in fact current and is valid for thirty days after
-3-

LB1139 LB1139
2026 2026
the date of certification;
(4) Full faith and credit shall be accorded to a lien arising by
operation of law against real and personal property for amounts overdue
relating to a support order owed by a judgment debtor or obligor who
resides or owns property in this state when another state agency, party,
or other entity seeking to enforce such lien complies with the procedural
rules relating to the filing of the lien in this state. The state agency,
party, or other entity seeking to enforce such lien shall send a
certified copy of the support order with all modifications, the notice of
lien prescribed by 42 U.S.C. 652(a)(11) and 42 U.S.C. 654(9)(E), and the
appropriate fee to the clerk of the district court in the jurisdiction
within this state in which the lien is sought. Upon receiving the
appropriate documents and fee, the clerk of the district court shall
accept the documents filed and such acceptance shall constitute entry of
the foreign support order for purposes of this section only. Entry of a
lien arising in another state pursuant to this section shall result in
such lien being afforded the same treatment as liens arising in this
state. The filing process required by this section shall not be construed
as requiring an application, complaint, answer, and hearing as might be
required for the filing or registration of foreign judgments under the
Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act or the Uniform
Interstate Family Support Act;
(5) Support order judgments shall cease to be liens on real or
registered personal property ten years from the date (a) the youngest
child becomes of age or dies or (b) the most recent execution was issued
to collect the judgment, whichever is later, and such lien shall not be
reinstated;
(6) Alimony and property settlement award judgments, if not covered
by subdivision (5) of this section, shall cease to be a lien on real or
registered personal property ten years from the date (a) the judgment was
entered, (b) the most recent payment was made, or (c) the most recent
-4-

LB1139 LB1139
2026 2026
execution was issued to collect the judgment, whichever is latest, and
such lien shall not be reinstated;
(7) The court may in any case, upon application or its own motion,
after notice and hearing, order a person required to make payments to
post sufficient security, bond, or other guarantee with the clerk to
insure payment of both current and any delinquent amounts. Upon failure
to comply with the order, the court may also appoint a receiver to take
charge of the debtor's property to insure payment. Any bond, security, or
other guarantee paid in cash may, when the court deems it appropriate, be
applied either to current payments or to reduce any accumulated
arrearage;
(8)(a) The lien of a mortgage or deed of trust which secures a loan,
the proceeds of which are used to purchase real property, and (b) any
lien given priority pursuant to a subordination document under this
section shall attach prior to any lien authorized by this section. Any
mortgage or deed of trust which secures the refinancing, renewal, or
extension of a real property purchase money mortgage or deed of trust
shall have the same lien priority with respect to any lien authorized by
this section as the original real property purchase money mortgage or
deed of trust to the extent that the amount of the loan refinanced,
renewed, or extended does not exceed the amount used to pay the principal
and interest on the existing real property purchase money mortgage or
deed of trust, plus the costs of the refinancing, renewal, or extension;
and
(9) Any lien authorized by this section against personal property
registered with any county consisting of a motor vehicle or mobile home
shall attach upon notation of the lien against the motor vehicle or
mobile home certificate of title and shall have its priority established
pursuant to the terms of section 60-164 or a subordination document
executed under this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 42-371, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-5-

LB1139 LB1139
2026 2026
Nebraska, is repealed.
-6-